Wisconsin, session 2025, SB724.
do enact as follows:SB724,11Section 1. 302.081 of the statutes is created to read:SB724,2,72302.081 Recreation and programming in state correctional 3institutions. (1) The department shall ensure that all state correctional 4institutions provide recreational opportunities and organized, structured 5programming that is relevant to the interests and needs of the inmates of the state 6correctional institutions. The department shall prioritize the following types of 7structured programming under this subsection:SB724,2,88(a) Academic instruction.SB724,2,99(b) Vocational training.SB724,2,1010(c) Career development.SB724,2,1111(d) Work experience.SB724,2,1212(e) Reentry planning.SB724,2,1313(f) Faith-based activities.SB724,3,11(g) Behavioral health.SB724,3,22(h) Health and wellness.SB724,3,33(i) Technology literacy.SB724,3,44(j) Social-cultural enrichment.SB724,3,145(2) (a) If the level of correctional officer staffing and structured programming 6staffing is equal to or greater than 80 percent for a state correctional institution, 7except as provided in par. (c), the warden or superintendent of the state correctional 8institution shall ensure that each inmate is allowed not less than 35 hours per week 9to engage in recreational opportunities and structured programming under sub. (1), 10with an average of not less than 5 total hours per day for such activities and 11programming. Of the 35 hours per week, each inmate shall be allowed not less than 127 hours per week to engage in recreational opportunities and not less than 14 hours 13per week to engage in structured programming, of which at least 5 hours shall be 14allocated to structured programming other than work experience under sub. (1) (d).SB724,4,215(b) If the level of correctional officer staffing and structured programming 16staffing is less than 80 percent for a state correctional institution, except as 17provided in par. (c), the warden or superintendent of the state correctional 18institution shall ensure that each inmate is allowed not less than 21 hours per week 19to engage in recreational opportunities and structured programming under sub. (1), 20with an average of not less than 3 total hours per day for such activities and 21programming. Of the 21 hours per week, each inmate shall be allowed not less than 227 hours per week to engage in recreational opportunities and not less than 14 hours 1per week to engage in structured programming, of which at least 5 hours shall be 2allocated to structured programming other than work experience under sub. (1) (d).SB724,4,73(c) If an inmate is subject to a partial or full prison lockdown or is currently 4being held in solitary confinement, the warden or superintendent of the state 5correctional institution may deny the inmate the time specified under par. (a) or (b) 6to engage in recreational opportunities and structured programming for a period 7not to exceed 10 consecutive days.SB724,28Section 2. 302.082 of the statutes is created to read:SB724,4,149302.082 Recreation and programming in county jails and houses of 10correction. (1) The sheriff shall ensure that the county jail or house of correction 11provides recreational opportunities and organized, structured programming that is 12relevant to the interests and needs of the inmates of the county jail or house of 13correction. The sheriff shall prioritize the following types of structured 14programming under this subsection:SB724,4,1515(a) Academic instruction.SB724,4,1616(b) Vocational training.SB724,4,1717(c) Career development.SB724,4,1818(d) Work experience.SB724,4,1919(e) Reentry planning.SB724,4,2020(f) Faith-based activities.SB724,4,2121(g) Behavioral health.SB724,4,2222(h) Health and wellness.SB724,4,2323(i) Technology literacy.SB724,5,11(j) Social-cultural enrichment.SB724,5,52(2) (a) Except as provided in par. (c), beginning on the 31st day of an inmate’s 3confinement, the sheriff shall ensure that the inmate is allowed not less than 10 4hours per week to engage in recreational opportunities and structured 5programming under sub. (1).SB724,5,166(b) 1. Except as provided in par. (c), beginning on the 91st day of an inmate’s 7confinement, if the level of uniformed officer staffing and structured programming 8staffing is equal to or greater than 80 percent for a county jail or house of 9correction, the sheriff shall ensure that the inmate is allowed not less than 35 hours 10per week to engage in recreational opportunities and structured programming 11under sub. (1), with an average of not less than 5 total hours per day for such 12activities and programming. Of the 35 hours per week, the inmate shall be allowed 13not less than 7 hours per week to engage in recreational opportunities and not less 14than 14 hours per week to engage in structured programming, of which at least 5 15hours shall be allocated to structured programming other than work experience 16under sub. (1) (d).SB724,6,317(b) 2. Except as provided in par. (c), beginning on the 91st day of an inmate’s 18confinement, if the level of uniformed officer staffing and structured programming 19staffing is less than 80 percent for a county jail or house of correction, the sheriff 20shall ensure that the inmate is allowed not less than 21 hours per week to engage in 21recreational opportunities and structured programming under sub. (1), with an 22average of not less than 3 total hours per day for such activities and programming. 23Of the 21 hours per week, the inmate shall be allowed not less than 7 hours per 1week to engage in recreational opportunities and not less than 14 hours per week to 2engage in structured programming, of which at least 5 hours shall be allocated to 3structured programming other than work experience under sub. (1) (d).SB724,6,74(c) If an inmate is subject to a partial or full jail lockdown or is currently being 5held in solitary confinement, the sheriff may deny the inmate the time specified 6under par. (a) or (b) to engage in recreational opportunities and structured 7programming for a period not to exceed 10 consecutive days.SB724,6,88